Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
ARTICLE 9
REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION DISTRICT ACT

Editor's note:

For a discussion of the difference between service authorities authorized by section 17 of article XIV of the Colorado constitution and statutorily created special districts, see Anema v. Transit Const. Authority, 788 P.2d 1261 (Colo. 1990).

Cross references:

For formation of a metropolitan district within a regional transportation district, see § 32-1-1004 (6).

Section

32-9-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Regional Transportation District Act".

Source:

L. 69:

p. 714, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-1.

32-9-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly determines, finds, and declares:

That the creation of the regional transportation district will promote the public health, safety, convenience, economy, and welfare of the residents of the district and of the state of Colorado; and

That a general law cannot be made applicable to the district and to the properties, powers, duties, functions, privileges, immunities, rights, liabilities, and disabilities of such district as provided in this article because of a number of atypical factors and special conditions concerning same.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 714, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-2.

32-9-103. Definitions.

As used in this article 9, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Board" means the board of directors of the district.

"Condemn" or "condemnation" means the exercise by the district of the power of dominant eminent domain or eminent domain, in the manner provided in articles 1 to 7 of title 38, C.R.S., to acquire mass transportation facilities and property, real or personal, or an interest therein, for the public use of the district.

"Director" means a member of the board.

(3.5) "Director district" means that area within the district which is represented by one director.

(3.7) "Discovery" means physical discovery of an undocumented utility communicated by the district or its contractors, agents, or employees verbally or in writing to the utility company's designated project representative or, if no representative has been designated, to the chief engineer or equivalent.

"District" means the regional transportation district created by this article.

"District securities" means bonds, temporary bonds, refunding bonds, special obligation bonds, interim notes, notes, and warrants of the district authorized to be issued by this article.

"Dominant eminent domain" means that the right of the district to condemn public property, real and personal, shall be superior in public necessity to that of any city, town, city and county, county, or other public corporation except a school district, but such right shall be superior only for the purpose of acquiring existing mass transportation facilities and related real or personal property.

(6.2) "Eligible elector" means a registered elector as defined in section 1-1-104 (35), C.R.S., who resides within the geographic boundaries of the district.

(6.3) "Fixed guideway corridor" means a corridor designated by the district for the construction and operation of a fixed guideway mass transit system.

(6.4) "Fixed guideway corridor utility relocation agreement" means an agreement entered into by the district and a utility company for the purpose of performing utility relocation work necessitated by a transportation expansion plan in accordance with the requirements of section 32-9-119.1.

(6.5) "Fixed guideway mass transit system" means any public transportation system that utilizes and occupies a separate right-of-way or rail for the exclusive use of public transportation service. No such system shall intersect any road or street with an average daily traffic count of twenty thousand or greater at grade unless the municipality or county having jurisdiction over such road or street specifically requests an at grade crossing.

(6.7) "Force majeure" means fire, explosion, action of the elements, strike, interruption of transportation, rationing, shortage of labor, equipment, or materials, court action, illegality, unusually severe weather, act of God, act of war, or any other cause that is beyond the control of the party performing work on a utility relocation project and that could not have been prevented by the party while exercising reasonable diligence.

(6.9) "Major electrical facilities" has the same meaning as set forth in section 29-20-108 (3)(a)(I), (3)(a)(II), (3)(a)(III), and (3)(a)(IV).

"Mass transportation system" or "system" means any system of the district or any other system, the owner or operator of which contracts with the district for the provision of transportation services, that transports the general public by bus, rail, or any other means of surface conveyance or any combination thereof, within the district.

Such system may include facilities for transportation within or without or both within and without the district as special charter services provided to the general public. The schedule of charges for special charter service shall be equal to but not less than those charged by authorized common carriers rendering the same or similar service. The service may be performed under such terms and conditions for which facilities are made available for such charter use and in conformity with the reasonable rules and regulations provided by the board with respect to the use thereof, but the special charter service outside the district shall be limited to such rights and privileges as are obtained by the district in the acquisition of mass transportation facilities and property.

The system may include facilities for the transportation of package-express shipments on routes to and from Boulder and Denver if such shipments are transported coincidentally with the transportation of the general public in scheduled service and over prescribed routes within the district. The schedule of charges for package-express service shall not be less than those charged by authorized common carriers rendering the same or similar service over the same routes and distances. The package-express service may be performed under such terms and conditions for which facilities are made available for such package-express use and in conformity with the rules and regulations established by the board with respect to the use thereof.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 307, § 1, effective April 5, 2000.)

"Operation and maintenance expenses" means all reasonable and necessary current expenses of the district, paid or accrued, of operating, maintaining, and repairing facilities of the mass transportation system of the district.

"Person" means any natural person, association, partnership, company, or corporation.

"Public body" means the state of Colorado, or any county, city and county, city, town, district, or any other political subdivision of the state, excluding the regional transportation district.

"Publication" means the publication once a week for three consecutive weeks in at least one newspaper having general circulation in the district. Publication need not be made on the same day of the week in each of the three weeks; but not less than fourteen days shall intervene between the first day of publication and the last day of publication.

"Revenues" means the tolls, fees, rates, charges, or other income and revenues derived from the operation of the mass transportation system of the district, moneys received in the form of grants or contributions from all sources, public or private, income derived from investments by the district, and any combination of the foregoing.

"Taxes" or "taxation" means general ad valorem property taxes only.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 907, § 157, effective January 1, 1993.)

(15.1) "Utility company" or "utility" shall have the same meaning as set forth in 23 CFR 645.105, as amended.

(15.5) "Utility facility" means all installed equipment of a utility.

"Vehicular service" means any service provided by the district that involves transporting the general public by means of any self-propelled vehicle that is designed primarily for travel on the public highways and that is generally and commonly used to transport persons and property over the public highways. "Vehicular service" does not include any service provided by the district that is part of the rail system.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 714, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-3.

L. 70:

p. 292, § 97.

L. 71:

p. 978, § 1.

L. 73:

p. 985, § 1.

Initiated 80:

(3.5) added, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, December 19, 1980.

L. 81:

(7)(a) amended and (7)(c) added, p. 1640, § 1, effective May 28; (15) amended, p. 1626, § 32, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(7)(a) amended, p. 1119, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(6.3) and (6.5) added and (7)(a) amended, p. 1246, § 2, effective May 22.

L. 92:

(6.2) added and (15) amended, p. 907, § 157, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(7)(a) amended, p. 1790, § 79, effective June 6.

L. 94:

(6.2) amended, p. 460, § 1, effective March 29; (6.3) amended, p. 1324, § 1, effective May 25.

L. 97:

(6.2) amended, p. 805, § 1, effective May 20.

L. 99:

(6.5) and (7)(a) amended, p. 1400, §§ 3, 4, effective June 4.

L. 2000:

(8) and (13) amended, p. 307, § 1, effective April 5.

L. 2003:

(16) added, p. 1795, § 1, effective May 21.

L. 2007:

(3.7), (6.4), (6.7), (6.9), (15.1), and (15.5) added, p. 717, § 1, effective May 3.

L. 2022:

IP and (6.9) amended, (HB 22-1104), ch. 97, p. 467, § 8, effective April 13.

Editor's note:

For the complete initiated measure and votes cast for the adoption or rejection thereof, see L. 81, pp. 2057-2060.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration contained in the 1999 act amending subsections (6.5) and (7)(a), see section 1 of chapter 338, Session Laws of Colorado 1999.

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1104, see section 1 of chapter 97, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

32-9-104. Liberal construction.

This article being necessary to secure and preserve the public health, safety, and general welfare, the rule of strict construction shall have no application to this article, but it shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes and objects for which this article is intended.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 731, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-62.

32-9-105. Creation of district.

There is hereby created a district to be known and designated as the "Regional Transportation District".

Source:

L. 69:

p. 715, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-4.

32-9-106. District area. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 69:

p. 715, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-5.

L. 71:

p. 981, § 1.

L. 73:

pp. 985, 988, §§ 2, 1.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 1300, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 77:

(2)(a) amended, p. 287, § 60, effective June 29.

L. 81:

(2)(a.1) added and (2)(b)(I) amended, pp. 1641, 1644, §§ 2, 3, effective May 28.

L. 86:

(3) added, p. 1070, § 1, effective March 20.

L. 91:

(3) amended, p. 1071, § 46, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1) amended and (4) added, p. 986, § 1, effective July 1; (2)(c)(I)(A) amended, p. 908, § 158, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(1) and (2)(d) amended, p. 1339, § 2, effective May 25.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 308, § 2, effective April 15.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 419, § 2, effective April 30.

L. 2001:

(1) amended and (5) and (6) added, p. 259, § 4, effective November 15.

L. 2007:

Entire section repealed, p. 836, § 10, effective October 1.

32-9-106.1. District area.

Subject to the requirements of paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section, the area comprising the district shall consist of the following:

The area within the district on July 1, 2007; and

Any additional area annexed to or included in the district after July 1, 2007, as provided in sections 32-9-106.6, 32-9-106.7, and 32-9-106.8.

The area specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall not include any area removed from the district for any reason on or after July 1, 2007.

The board shall ensure that the entire district area shall be depicted on a map and the area's description stated in a written document. In the event of a discrepancy between the area depicted on the map and the description of the area stated in the written document, the written document shall be held to be the accurate description of the area.

In depicting and describing the entire district area as specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), the board shall ensure that:

If the district area references an existing county boundary or an existing boundary of an annexation, the district area shall coincide with the existing county boundary or existing boundary of the annexation;

Gaps in the district area shall be avoided by following the most directly referenced parcel or aliquot line;

Subdivided parcels, tracts, or lots that lie fifty percent or more within the district area shall be included in the district area;

Subdivided parcels, tracts, or lots that lie less than fifty percent within the district area shall not be included in the district area; and

When a previous statutory district area reference is ambiguous or unclear, the district area shall be determined to follow along the boundary of the district area as previously determined by the district.

The map and written document specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall be maintained in the district office and shall be open to public inspection and made available for copying.

Copies of the map and written document specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall be certified by the secretary of the board and shall be filed with the secretary of state, the division of local government in the department of local affairs, the department of revenue, the transportation and energy committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committee, and the transportation committee of the senate, or any successor committee.

The map and written document specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall first be completed on July 1, 2007, and shall be updated no later than thirty days after any additional area is annexed or included in the district as provided for in paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section or after any area is removed from the district for any reason.

If the map and written document specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) are updated as specified in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (e), the new map and written document shall be promptly certified by the secretary of the board and filed as provided in paragraph (d) of this subsection (2). Upon receiving a certified copy of the updated map and written document pursuant to this subparagraph (II), the department of revenue shall communicate with any retailer within the taxing jurisdictions affected by the inclusion of any additional area in or the removal of any area from the district in order to facilitate the administration and collection of taxes within the area comprising the district and to identify all retailers affected by the inclusion or removal of any area. The department shall make copies of any such written document and map available to all taxing jurisdictions in the state, including any special district that imposes a sales tax.

An annexation or inclusion of additional area into the district as provided in sections 32-9-106.6, 32-9-106.7, and 32-9-106.8 shall not become effective until the board updates the map and written document specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) as required in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (e).

In addition to the map and written document specified in paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section, the district shall also ensure that the district area in each county, whether the district is included in an incorporated or unincorporated portion of each county, is depicted on a separate map and its description stated in a separate written document. In the event of a discrepancy between the area depicted on the map and the description of the area stated in the written document, the written document shall be held to be the accurate description of the area.

The map and written document specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) shall be maintained in the district office and shall be open to public inspection and copying.

Copies of the maps and written documents specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) shall be certified by the secretary of the board and shall be recorded in the office of the county clerk and recorder of each appropriate county. Copies of the map and written document specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) shall also be filed with the secretary of state, the division of local government in the department of local affairs, the department of revenue, the transportation and energy committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committee, and the transportation committee of the senate, or any successor committee.

The map and written document specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) shall first be completed on July 1, 2007, and shall be updated no later than thirty days after any additional area in a county is annexed or included in the district as provided for in paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section or after any area in a county is removed from the district for any reason.

If a map and written document specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) is updated as specified in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (d), the new map and written document shall be promptly certified by the secretary of the board and recorded as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection (3).

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 831, § 1, effective May 14.

32-9-106.3. Additional district areas - rights-of-way - Douglas county. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1328, § 1, effective May 25.

L. 96:

(3)(a)(II)(B) amended, p. 1079, § 2, effective May 23.

L. 2007:

Entire section repealed, p. 836, § 10, effective October 1.

32-9-106.4. Additional district areas - Adams county. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 306, § 1, effective April 15; (2)(a)(II)(B) amended, p. 1079, § 3, effective May 23.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 836, § 2, effective May 4.

32-9-106.5. Additional district areas - Weld county. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 1269, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 836, § 2, effective May 4.

32-9-106.6. Additional district areas as a result of annexation.

Subject to the requirements of section 32-9-106.1 (2)(e)(III), in addition to the areas described in section 32-9-106.1, the following areas are included in the district:

Repealed.

Area that is annexed by a municipality on or after May 25, 1994, if the municipality or part of the municipality was in the district at the time of the annexation. This annexed area shall also be included in the following districts automatically upon annexation:

The Denver metropolitan major league baseball stadium district, if the municipality to which the area is annexed is in such district; and

The Denver metropolitan scientific and cultural facilities district, if the municipality to which the area is annexed is in such district.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1328, § 1, effective May 25.

L. 96:

IP(2) and (2)(b) amended, p. 1080, § 4, effective May 23.

L. 2007:

IP(1) amended, p. 834, § 4, effective May 14; (1)(a) and (2) repealed, p. 836, § 10, effective October 1.

32-9-106.7. Additional district area - petition or election - required filings - definitions.

Subject to the requirements of section

32-9-106.1 (2)(e)

(III), the following areas may be included in the district according to the terms set forth in this section:

For any parcel of land thirty-five acres or more that is located in the incorporated or unincorporated portion of any county and has a boundary that is contiguous to any boundary of the district, the land may be included in the district upon presentation to the board of a petition signed by one hundred percent of the owners of the land sought to be included. The petition shall contain a legal description of the land, shall state that assent to the inclusion is given by the fee owner or owners thereof, and shall be acknowledged by the fee owner or owners in the same manner as required for the conveyance of land.

For any area in an incorporated or unincorporated portion of any county containing multiple parcels of land, any of which is less than thirty-five acres and which area is contiguous to any boundary of the district, the area may be included in the district after one of the following conditions is met:

One hundred percent of the owners of the land within the specified area, including the owners of any land constituting a planned unit development or subdivision, submit a petition to the board seeking inclusion in the district. The petition shall contain a legal description of the land, shall state that assent to the inclusion is given by the fee owner or owners thereof, and shall be acknowledged by the fee owner or owners in the same manner as required for the conveyance of land.

A petition requesting an election for the purpose of including the specified area in the district signed by at least eight percent of the eligible electors who reside within the geographic boundaries of the area is submitted to the board. The petition shall contain a legal description of the area; and

The board authorizes an election to be held in the area sought to be included and a majority of those registered electors, as defined in section

1-1-104

(35), C.R.S., who reside within the geographic boundaries of the area and who vote in such election, approve the inclusion of the area in the district.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 623, § 1, effective April 26, 2007.)

(1.5) (a) As used in this subsection (1.5), "area" means:

All or any portion of a county entirely outside the boundaries of the district; or

Portions of a county that are not within the boundaries of the district when other portions of the county are within the boundaries of the district.

Subject to the requirements of section

32-9-106.1 (2)(e)

(III), the area that is contiguous to any boundary of the district may be included in the district according to the following terms:

An election is requested for the purpose of including the area in the district by one of the following methods:

A petition signed by at least eight percent of the eligible electors in both incorporated and unincorporated portions of the area who reside within the geographic boundaries of the area is submitted to the board. The petition shall contain a legal description of the area to be included within the district.

A resolution by the board of county commissioners of the county to hold an election for the purpose of including the area, including municipalities and home rule municipalities, in the district is submitted to the board of directors of the district. The resolution shall contain a legal description of the area to be included within the district.

The board authorizes an election to be held at the same time for both the incorporated and unincorporated portions of the area seeking to be included in the district and a majority of those registered electors, as defined in section

1-1-104

(35), C.R.S., who reside within the geographic boundaries of the area and who vote in the election approve the inclusion of the area in the district.

No election shall be held for inclusion of any area into the district pursuant to this section unless the board of directors of the district first resolves to accept the area if the election is successful. No petition for the inclusion of any area into the district shall be accepted except upon majority vote of the board of directors of the district.

A petition submitted to the voters pursuant to this section shall be filed with the board at least one hundred twenty days before the election at which the ballot question is submitted to a vote. Upon receiving such petition, the board shall designate an election official to conduct the election and provide a copy of the petition to such official. Upon declaring the petition sufficient, the board shall submit the petition along with the ballot question to the coordinated election official in accordance with section 1-7-116, C.R.S., and the coordinated election official shall conduct the election.

Any ballot for any election authorized by this section shall include a description of the specified area proposed to be included in the district and the current rate of sales tax levied by the regional transportation district.

The ballot shall contain the following question: "Shall the area described in the ballot be included in the regional transportation district?"

An election held pursuant to this section shall be conducted in accordance with articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S., and any other requirements of this section. The election shall be run by the office of the clerk and recorder of the county containing the area seeking inclusion in the district. The ballot question shall be submitted to a vote pursuant to this section only at a state general election or, if the board so determines, at a special election held on the first Tuesday in November of an odd-numbered year. The district shall pay for all costs associated with the election.

The board shall call the election authorized by this section by resolution. The resolution shall state:

The object and purpose of the election;

A description of the area proposed to be included in the district;

The date of the election; and

The name of the designated election official who is responsible for conducting the election pursuant to articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 417, § 1, effective April 30.

L. 2000:

(4) added, p. 422, § 3, effective August 2.

L. 2003:

(1)(b)(II)(B) and (1)(c) amended, p. 821, § 1, effective April 1.

L. 2006:

(1.5) added, p. 835, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 2007:

(1)(a), IP(1)(b), and (1)(c) amended, p. 623, § 1, effective April 26; IP(1) and IP(1.5)(b) amended, p. 834, § 5, effective May 14; (4) repealed, p. 836, § 10, effective October 1.

32-9-106.8. Additional district areas - annexation of unincorporated territory that is entirely surrounded by the district.

Subject to the requirements of section 32-9-106.1 (2)(e)(III), when any unincorporated territory is entirely contained within the boundaries of the district, the board may, by resolution, annex the territory to the district. The board shall give notice of a proposed annexation resolution by publishing a copy of the resolution once a week for four successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the territory proposed to be annexed. The board shall also send a copy of the proposed annexation resolution by registered mail to the board of county commissioners and county attorney of the county containing the territory to be annexed, to any special district or school district having territory within the territory to be annexed, and to the executive director of the department of revenue. The first publication of the notice and the mailing of the proposed annexation resolution shall occur at least thirty days prior to the final adoption of the resolution, and the board shall allow interested persons to testify for or against the resolution at a public hearing held prior to the final adoption of the resolution.

No territory may be annexed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section if any part of the district boundary or area surrounding the territory consists of public rights-of-way, including streets and alleys, that are not immediately adjacent to the district on the side of the right-of-way opposite to the territory.

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 821, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2007:

(1) amended, p. 834, § 6, effective May 14.

32-9-106.9. District area - town of Castle Rock in Douglas county.

In consideration of the fact that various noncontiguous parcels containing less than twenty percent of the residents of the town of Castle Rock are included in the district, the voters within the boundaries of the town of Castle Rock may elect to consolidate the status of the town of Castle Rock as completely included in or completely excluded from the boundaries of the district at an election held pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

The outcome of any election held pursuant to subsection (3) of this section shall apply to any area that is annexed by the town of Castle Rock on or after the date of such election, regardless of whether the area was included within the boundaries of the district before the annexation.

Pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the area included within the boundaries of the town of Castle Rock may be included in or excluded from the district if the following requirements are met:

Two proposals, one to include the area and one to exclude the area, are initiated by any of the following methods:

Two petitions, one requesting an election for the purpose of including the area in the district and one requesting an election for the purpose of excluding the area from the district, are each signed by at least five percent of the registered electors within the town of Castle Rock and submitted to the governing body of the town of Castle Rock; or

The governing body of the town of Castle Rock adopts two resolutions, one to hold an election for the purpose of including the area in the district and one to hold an election for the purpose of excluding the area from the district.

An election is held and conducted in accordance with articles 1 to 13 of title 1 or article 10 of title 31, C.R.S., as applicable, and the following requirements:

The election is held either at the odd-year election held on the first Tuesday in November of 2005 or any regular local district election for the town of Castle Rock held thereafter, as determined by the governing body of the town of Castle Rock. The town of Castle Rock shall pay the costs of such elections.

One ballot question provides for all of the registered electors in the town of Castle Rock to vote for or against the inclusion of the proposed area in the district and one ballot question provides for all of the registered electors in the town of Castle Rock to vote for or against the exclusion of the area from the district.

Each ballot question specifies that the area proposed to be included in or excluded from the district, as applicable, is all of the area within the boundaries of the town of Castle Rock.

Each ballot question contains the current rates of sales and use tax levied by the district.

The ballot contains both of the following questions:

"Shall the area described in the ballot be included in the regional transportation district and subject to taxation by the district?"; and

"Shall the area described in the ballot be excluded from the regional transportation district and not subject to taxation by the district?".

In the event that either the ballot question to include all of the area within the boundaries of the town of Castle Rock in the district or the ballot question to exclude all of the area within the boundaries of the town of Castle Rock from the district is approved by a majority of the registered electors who voted in the election and the other ballot question is not approved by a majority of the registered electors who voted in the election, the ballot question that was approved by a majority of the registered electors who voted in the election shall take effect.

In the event that both the ballot question to include all of the area within the boundaries of the town of Castle Rock in the district and the ballot question to exclude all of the area within the boundaries of the town of Castle Rock from the district are approved by a majority of the registered electors who voted in the election, only the ballot question that receives the larger number of votes in favor of the question shall take effect.

In the event that neither the ballot question to include all of the area within the boundaries of the town of Castle Rock in the district nor the ballot question to exclude all of the area within the boundaries of the town of Castle Rock from the district is approved by a majority of registered electors who voted in the election, neither ballot question shall take effect and the boundaries of the district shall continue to include the parts of the town of Castle Rock that were included in the district before such election.

In the event that the registered electors of the town of Castle Rock elect to be included within or excluded from the boundaries of the district, the town of Castle Rock shall grant the department of revenue any costs up to the amount of seventeen thousand five hundred dollars it incurs in carrying out the requirements of this section.

Under no circumstance shall any moneys from the general fund be appropriated to the department of revenue or any other department to cover the costs incurred in carrying out the requirements of this section.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 680, § 1, effective August 4.

32-9-107. Mass transportation system.

The district, acting by and through the board, is authorized to develop, maintain, and operate a mass transportation system for the benefit of the inhabitants of the district.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 715, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-6.

L. 72:

p. 483, § 8.

L. 83:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1282, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1326, § 8, effective May 25.

32-9-107.5. Regional fixed guideway mass transit system - authorization.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that:

The construction of a fixed guideway mass transit system in the Denver metropolitan area is a matter of statewide concern; and

Such a system is necessary for economic development, commerce, and the reduction of air pollution.

The general assembly further finds and declares that the development of mass transportation systems is in the best interests of the citizens of the Denver metropolitan area. The general assembly also believes that such a system should be financed by a mixture of private funds, of federal funds which have been identified for these purposes, and of receipts from a sales tax on the residents of the district.

The general assembly further declares that it is the intent of this section that long-range planning continue in order to identify fixed guideway corridors as the demand is demonstrated.

The general assembly further declares that, where practicable, the board should encourage the use of Colorado residents, goods, and services in implementing this section.

and (3) Repealed.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 1247, § 3, effective May 22.

L. 92:

(2)(b) and (3)(b) amended, p. 1345, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1)(b) and (1)(c) amended and (2) and (3) repealed, pp. 1324, 1327, §§ 2, 9, effective May 25.

Cross references:

For priority of civil actions arising out of the planning, development, financing, or construction of the Denver metropolitan area mass transportation system, see article 85 of title 13.

32-9-107.7. Regional fixed guideway mass transit systems - construction - authorization.

Any action of the board relating to the authorization of the construction of a regional fixed guideway mass transit system in any corridor shall require the affirmative vote of a two-thirds majority of the board membership. The board shall take no action relating to the construction of a regional fixed guideway mass transit system until after such system has been approved by the designated metropolitan planning organization. Each component part or corridor of such system shall be separately approved by the metropolitan planning organization. Such action shall include approval of the method of financing and the technology selected for such projects.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 1511, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2002:

(2) repealed, p. 866, § 1, effective August 7.

32-9-108. Authorizing election. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 69:

p. 716, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-7.

L. 70:

p. 292, § 98.

L. 72:

p. 482, § 6.

L. 73:

pp. 986, 991, §§ 3, 1.

L. 80:

(3) added, p. 679, § 1, effective May 1.

L. 82:

(3) repealed, p. 502, § 8, effective April 15.

L. 83:

Entire section repealed, p. 1284, § 6, effective June 3.

32-9-109. Board of directors. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 69:

p. 716, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-8.

L. 70:

p. 292, § 99.

L. 73:

p. 988, § 2.

Editor's note:

This section was repealed in 1980 by initiative, effective January 1, 1983. For the complete initiated measure and votes cast for the adoption or rejection thereof, see L. 81, pp. 2057-2060.

32-9-109.5. Board of directors - membership - powers.

Effective January 1, 1983, the governing body of the district shall be a board of directors consisting of fifteen persons, each of whom is an eligible elector residing within the director district.

Members of the board of directors shall be elected as provided in section 32-9-111.

The terms of members of the board serving on December 31, 1982, shall expire on January 1, 1983, and a new board, constituted pursuant to this section shall take office on January 1, 1983, after having been elected pursuant to section 32-9-111.

All powers, duties, functions, rights, and privileges vested in the district shall be exercised and performed by the board; except that the exercise of any executive, administrative, or ministerial powers may be delegated by the board to officers and employees of the district.

Source:

Initiated 80:

Entire section added, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, December 19, 1980.

L. 92:

(1) amended, p. 908, § 159, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

For the complete initiated measure and votes cast for the adoption or rejection thereof, see L. 81, pp. 2057-2060.

32-9-110. Initial board. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 69:

p. 716, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-9.

L. 70:

p. 292, § 100.

L. 73:

p. 989, §§ 3, 4.

L. 75:

IP(1) and (2) amended, p. 1303, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was repealed in 1980 by initiative, effective January 1, 1983. For the complete initiated measure and votes cast for the adoption or rejection thereof, see L. 81, pp. 2057-2060.